South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-130(C)(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6) the current and reasonably anticipated earnings of both spouses; provided, however, that for a marriage lasting ten years or less, reasonably anticipated earnings must be based on what each spouse could have earned without taking into consideration opportunities missed to be a spouse or parent; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----